Wisconsin, session 2025, SB684.
do enact as follows:SB684,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB684,28Section 2. 20.835 (2) (de) of the statutes is created to read:SB684,2,11920.835 (2) (de) Long-term care insurance assessment credit. The amounts in 10the schedule to make the payments under ss. 71.07 (12) (d) 2., 71.28 (12) (d) 2., 1171.47 (12) (d) 2., and 76.633 (4).SB684,312Section 3. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1315, is amended to read:SB684,3,21471.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 15(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), (5h), 16(5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a 17partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 1that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 2under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB684,43Section 4. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB684,3,5471.07 (12) Long-term care insurance assessment credit. (a) Definitions. 5In this subsection:SB684,3,661. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB684,3,872. “Disability insurer” means an insurer classified as a disability insurer 8under s. 646.51 (3) (bm) 2.SB684,3,149(b) Filing claims. Subject to the limitations provided under this subsection, 10for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, a claimant may claim as a 11credit against the taxes imposed under s. 71.02, for the taxable year following the 12taxable year that a claimant pays an assessment under s. 646.51 (3) (bm), and for 13the immediately following 4 taxable years, an amount equal to 20 percent of the 14assessment under s. 646.51 (3) (bm) paid by the claimant.SB684,3,1815(c) Limitations. 1. A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 16corporation, including a partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 17corporation that makes an election under s. 71.21 (6) (a) or 71.365 (4m) (a) to be 18taxed at the entity level, may claim the credit under par. (b).SB684,3,20192. A partnership’s partners, limited liability company’s members, and tax-20option corporation’s shareholders may not claim the credit under par. (b).SB684,3,2221(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 22credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB684,4,5232. If the claimant is a disability insurer and if the allowable amount of the 24claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax otherwise due under s. 71.02 or 71.21 (6) (a), 1the amount of the claim not used to offset the tax due shall be certified by the 2department of revenue to the department of administration for payment to the 3claimant by check, share draft, or other draft drawn from the appropriation account 4under s. 20.835 (2) (de). Notwithstanding s. 71.82 (1) (b), no interest shall be added 5to amounts certified under this subdivision.SB684,56Section 5. 71.10 (4) (co) of the statutes is created to read:SB684,4,8771.10 (4) (co) Long-term care insurance assessment credit under s. 71.07 (12), 8except as provided under par. (i).SB684,69Section 6. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 10is amended to read:SB684,4,201171.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 12preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 13beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 1471.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 1571.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., film production services credit under s. 71.07 (5f) (b) 2., veterans 16and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 71.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs 17credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and information technology manufacturing 18zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), long-term care insurance assessment credit under 19s. 71.07 (12) (d) 2., earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 (9e), estimated tax 20payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.SB684,721Section 7. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 22is amended to read:SB684,5,22371.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 2471.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 1(5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and passed through 2to partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB684,83Section 8. 71.21 (6) (d) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB684,5,6471.21 (6) (d) 3. Except as provided in s. ss. 71.07 (7) (b) 3. and (12) (c) 2., 71.28 5(12) (c) 2., and 71.47 (12) (c) 2., the tax credits under this chapter may not be 6claimed by the partnership.SB684,97Section 9. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 815, is amended to read:SB684,5,14971.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 10(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), 11(5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 12liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 13partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 14s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB684,1015Section 10. 71.28 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB684,5,171671.28 (12) Long-term care insurance assessment credit. (a) Definitions. 17In this subsection:SB684,5,18181. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB684,5,20192. “Disability insurer” means an insurer classified as a disability insurer 20under s. 646.51 (3) (bm) 2.SB684,6,221(b) Filing claims. Subject to the limitations provided under this subsection, 22for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, a claimant may claim as a 23credit against the taxes imposed under s. 71.23, for the taxable year following the 24taxable year that a claimant pays an assessment under s. 646.51 (3) (bm), and for 1the immediately following 4 taxable years, an amount equal to 20 percent of the 2assessment under s. 646.51 (3) (bm) paid by the claimant.SB684,6,63(c) Limitations. 1. A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 4corporation, including a partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option 5corporation that makes an election under s. 71.21 (6) (a) or 71.365 (4m) (a) to be 6taxed at the entity level, may claim the credit under par. (b).SB684,6,872. A partnership’s partners, limited liability company’s members, and tax-8option corporation’s shareholders may not claim the credit under par. (b).SB684,6,109(d) Administration. 1. Subsection (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the credit 10under sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB684,6,17112. If the claimant is a disability insurer and if the allowable amount of the 12claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax otherwise due under s. 71.23 or 71.365 (4m) (a), 13the amount of the claim not used to offset the tax due shall be certified by the 14department of revenue to the department of administration for payment to the 15claimant by check, share draft, or other draft drawn from the appropriation account 16under s. 20.835 (2) (de). Notwithstanding s. 71.82 (1) (b), no interest shall be added 17to amounts certified under this subdivision.SB684,1118Section 11. 71.30 (3) (dh) of the statutes is created to read:SB684,6,201971.30 (3) (dh) Long-term care insurance assessment credit under s. 71.28 20(12), except as provided under par. (f).SB684,1221Section 12. 71.30 (3) (f) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 22is amended to read:SB684,7,52371.30 (3) (f) The total of farmland preservation credit under subch. IX, jobs 24credit under s. 71.28 (3q), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.28 (3w), electronics 1and information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 71.28 (3wm), long-2term care insurance assessment credit under s. 71.28 (12) (d) 2., business 3development credit under s. 71.28 (3y), research credit under s. 71.28 (4) (k) 1., film 4production services credit under s. 71.28 (5f) (b) 2., and estimated tax payments 5under s. 71.29.SB684,136Section 13. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 715, is amended to read:SB684,7,11871.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 9corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 10(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10), and (12) 11and passed through to shareholders.SB684,1412Section 14. 71.365 (4m) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb684 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb684 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB684 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB684 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB684: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting